North Carolina, session 2025, SB775.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
PART I. PRESIDENT PRO TEMPORE'S RECOMMENDATIONS
SECTION 1.1. Effective immediately, Richard "Rick" Parrotte of New Hanover
County is appointed to the Disciplinary Hearing Commission of the North Carolina State Bar for
a term expiring June 30, 2027, to fill the unexpired term of W. Ellis Boyle.
SECTION 1.2. Effective immediately, Joe Knott of Wake County is appointed to
the State Property Tax Commission for a term expiring June 30, 2027, to fill the unexpired term
of W. Ellis Boyle.
SECTION 1.3. Effective immediately, Dr. Marc Sosne of New Hanover County is
appointed to the Cape Fear Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30,
2026, to fill the unexpired term of Bruce Moskowitz.
SECTION 1.4. Effective immediately, Dennis Mabe of Randolph County is
appointed to the Randolph Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30,
2026, to fill the unexpired term of J. Brooke Schmidly.
SECTION 1.5. Effective immediately, William A. "Billy" Yow of Guilford County
is appointed to the North Carolina Well Contractors Certification Commission for a term expiring
June 30, 2026, to fill the unexpired term of Chris Deal.
SECTION 1.6. Effective immediately, Edward "Ned" Curran of Mecklenburg
County is appointed to the Metropolitan Public Transportation Authority for a term expiring June
30, 2027.
SECTION 1.7. Effective immediately, Sonya Barber of Bladen County is appointed
to the Bladen Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2029, to fill the
unexpired term of Dixon Nance.
PART II. SPEAKER'S RECOMMENDATIONS
SECTION 2.1. Joaquin S. "Steve" Fuster of Wake County is appointed to the Home
Inspector's Licensure Board for a term expiring July 1, 2029, to fill the unexpired term of the
Honorable W. H. "Bill" Morris.
SECTION 2.2. Effective December 1, 2025, Matthew L. Bork of New Hanover
County, John Hayes of Caldwell County, and the Honorable Charles McGrady of Henderson
County are appointed to the Continuing Care Advisory Committee for terms expiring November
30, 2028.
SECTION 2.3. David Longo of Mecklenburg County is appointed to the
Metropolitan Public Transportation Authority for a term of two years to commence upon
approval by the Secretary of State of the articles of incorporation of the Metropolitan Public
Transportation Authority.
*S775-v-3*

SECTION 2.4. Michael H. Godwin of Guilford County is appointed to the Guilford
Technical Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 2.5. Justin W. Whiteside of Brunswick County is appointed to the
Brunswick Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2027, to fill the
unexpired term of the Honorable Frank Iler.
SECTION 2.6. Robert T. "Teddy" Davis, III, of New Hanover County is appointed
to the Cape Fear Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2026, to fill
the unexpired term of Marc Sosne.
PART III. CORRECTIONS
SECTION 3.1. Sections 2.3 and 2.4 of S.L. 2025-86 read as rewritten:
"SECTION 2.3. Effective October 1, 2025, the Honorable Deanna Ballard of Watauga
County and Benjamin P. Teague of Henderson County are appointed to NCInnovation for terms
expiring September 30, 2030.September 30, 2029.
"SECTION 2.4. Effective January 1, 2026, Tembila Covington of Forsyth County is
appointed to the North Carolina Partnership for Children, Inc., Board of Directors for a term
expiring December 31, 2027.December 31, 2028."
SECTION 3.2. Section 1.95 of S.L. 2025-29 reads as rewritten:
"SECTION 1.95. Dr. Sy A. Saeed of Pitt County and Reem S. Utterback of Wake County
are appointed to the Commission for Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities and Substance
Abuse Services for terms expiring July 30, 2028.June 30, 2028."
SECTION 3.3. Section 1.97 of S.L. 2025-29 reads as rewritten:
"SECTION 1.97. Heath R. Jenkins of Lincoln County is appointed to the Disciplinary
Hearing Commission of the North Carolina State Bar for a term expiring June 30, 2027.June 30,
2028."
SECTION 3.4. Section 1.104 of S.L. 2025-29 reads as rewritten:
"SECTION 1.104. Hunter "Gregg" Strader of Guilford County is appointed to the North
Carolina Agricultural Finance Authority for a term expiring June 30, 2028.July 1, 2028."
SECTION 3.5. Section 1.107 of S.L. 2025-29 reads as rewritten:
"SECTION 1.107. Dr. Phillip M. Stephens of Robeson County is appointed to the North
Carolina Boxing and Combat Sports Commission for a term expiring June 30, 2027.June 30,
2028."
SECTION 3.6. Section 1.117 of S.L. 2025-29 reads as rewritten:
"SECTION 1.117. Danny Barwick Smith of Lenoir County is appointed to the North
Carolina Global TransPark Authority Board of Directors for a term expiring June 30, 2027.June
30, 2029."
SECTION 3.7. Section 1.130 of S.L. 2025-29 reads as rewritten:
"SECTION 1.130. Thomas W. Glasgow of Carteret County is appointed to the North
Carolina Railroad Board of Directors for a term expiring June 30, 2028.June 30, 2029."
SECTION 3.8. Section 1.133 of S.L. 2025-29 reads as rewritten:
"SECTION 1.133. Eschol "BJ" Barnes, Jr., of Guilford County is appointed to the North
Carolina Sheriffs' Education and Training Standards Commission for a term expiring June 30,
2027.August 31, 2027."
SECTION 3.9. Section 1.135 of S.L. 2025-29 reads as rewritten:
"SECTION 1.135. Gerald Goolsby of Robeson County is appointed to the North Carolina
State Commission of Indian Affairs for a term expiring June 30, 2028.June 30, 2027."
SECTION 3.10. Section 1.141 of S.L. 2025-29 reads as rewritten:
"SECTION 1.141. William "Bill" D. MacRae of Wake County and Stacy E. Buff of
McDowell County are appointed to the Private Protective Services Board for terms expiring June
30, 2028.July 1, 2028."
SECTION 3.11. Section 2.105 of S.L. 2025-29 reads as rewritten:
Page 2 Session Law 2025-90 Senate Bill 775

"SECTION 2.105. Effective January 1, 2026, Representative Diane Wheatley of
Cumberland Erin Paré of Wake County is appointed to the Interstate Commission on Educational
Opportunities for Military Children State Council for a term expiring December 31, 2029."
SECTION 3.12. Section 2.126 of S.L. 2025-29 reads as rewritten:
"SECTION 2.126. The Honorable Pat Hurley Thornburg of Randolph County is appointed
to the Teachers and State Employees Retirement System Board of Trustees for a term expiring
June 30, 2027."
PART IV. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 4.1. This act is effective when it becomes law. Unless otherwise provided,
terms begin upon the effective date of this act.
In the General Assembly read three times and ratified this the 24th day of September,
2025.
s/ Ralph Hise
Presiding Officer of the Senate
s/ Howard Penny, Jr.
Presiding Officer of the House of Representatives
Senate Bill 775 Session Law 2025-90 Page 3